Idaho, session 2025, S1006.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 29-115, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
29-115. CONSTRUCTION CONTRACTS. (1) This section is applicable with
respect to all contracts entered into on or after July 1, 1990, between own-
ers and original contractors relating to the construction of any private
work of improvement.
(2) In any contract relating to the construction of any private work
of improvement, the retention proceeds withheld by the owner from the orig-
inal contractor or by the original contractor from any subcontractor from
any payment shall not exceed five percent (5%) of the payment and in no event
shall the total retention withheld exceed five percent (5%) of the contract
price. However, the five percent (5%) maximum that may be withheld does not
apply if the original contractor or the subcontractor fails to provide a per-
formance bond issued by a surety acceptable to the owner or original contrac-
tor if requested to do so by the owner or original contractor respectively.
The five percent (5%) maximum shall not apply to any contract for the perfor-
mance of a private work of improvement to residential real property consist-
ing of one (1) to four (4) units occupied or to be occupied by the owner.
(3) Within thirty-five (35) days from the date on which the work of im-
provement is substantially complete, as mutually agreed to by the parties
to the contract, the retention withheld by the owner shall be reduced to the
lesser of one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the estimated value of work yet
to be completed in accordance with the contract or the retention then with-
held by the owner, not to exceed five percent (5%) of the contract price.
Within thirty-five (35) days from the date of final completion of the work
of improvement, the retention withheld by the owner shall be released, ex-
cept in the event of a dispute between the owner and the original contractor,
the owner may withhold from the final retention payment an amount not to ex-
ceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the estimated value of the issue in
dispute. The owner may condition the final release of the retention upon re-
ceipt of satisfactory lien waivers from all persons with actual or potential
lien claims on the work of improvement.
(4) Subject to subsection (5) of this section, within ten (10) days from
the time that all or any portion of the retention proceeds are received by the
original contractor, the original contractor shall pay each of its subcon-


tractors from whom retention has been withheld, each subcontractor's share
of the retention received. However, if a retention payment received by the
original contractor is specifically designated for a particular subcontrac-
tor, payment of the retention shall be made to the designated subcontractor.
(5) The original contractor shall not be required to pay the retention
to a subcontractor if a bona fide dispute exists between the subcontractor
and the original contractor. The amount withheld from the retention payment
shall not exceed one hundred fifty percent (150%) of the estimated value of
the work yet to be completed or issue in dispute.
(6) Any contract relating to the construction of any private work of
improvement in Idaho, including contracts entered into by the original con-
tractor, any subcontractor, and anyone furnishing materials, equipment, or
services in construction of such improvement, shall be subject to the laws of
Idaho. Such contract shall not require litigation, arbitration, or another
dispute resolution process to occur in another state or country.
(6) (7) It shall be against public policy for any party to require any
other party to waive any provision of this statute.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.